Florida, session 2026, SB1002.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 28 29 Section 1.âParagraph (g) of subsection (37) and subsection 30 (53) of section 39.01, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 31 39.01âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, unless the 32 context otherwise requires: 33 (37)ââHarmâ to a childâs health or welfare can occur when 34 any person: 35 (g)âExposes a child to a controlled substance or alcohol. 36 Exposure to a controlled substance or alcohol is established by: 37 1.âA test, administered at birth, which indicated that the 38 childâs blood, urine, or meconium contained any amount of 39 alcohol or a controlled substance or metabolites of such 40 substances, the presence of which was not the result of medical 41 treatment administered to the mother or the newborn infant; or 42 2.âEvidence of extensive, abusive, and chronic use of a 43 controlled substance or alcohol by a parent to the extent that 44 the parentâs ability to provide supervision and care for the 45 child has been or is likely to be severely compromised; or 46 3.âEvidence of acute or chronic use of a controlled 47 substance by a parent to the extent that the ongoing threat of 48 the parentâs future intoxication compromises the parentâs 49 ability to guarantee and provide supervision and care for the 50 child. 51 52 As used in this paragraph, the term âcontrolled substanceâ means 53 prescription drugs not prescribed for the parent or not 54 administered as prescribed and controlled substances as outlined 55 in Schedule I or Schedule II of s. 893.03. 56 (53)ââNeglectâ occurs when: 57 (a)âA child is deprived of, or is allowed to be deprived 58 of, necessary food, clothing, shelter, or medical treatment or a 59 child is permitted to live in an environment when such 60 deprivation or environment causes the childâs physical, mental, 61 or emotional health to be significantly impaired or to be in 62 danger of being significantly impaired. The foregoing 63 circumstances shall not be considered neglect if caused 64 primarily by financial inability unless actual services for 65 relief have been offered to and rejected by such person. A 66 parent or legal custodian legitimately practicing religious 67 beliefs in accordance with a recognized church or religious 68 organization who thereby does not provide specific medical 69 treatment for a child may not, for that reason alone, be 70 considered a negligent parent or legal custodian; however, such 71 an exception does not preclude a court from ordering the 72 following services to be provided, when the health of the child 73 so requires: 74 1.(a)âMedical services from a licensed physician, dentist, 75 optometrist, podiatric physician, or other qualified health care 76 provider; or 77 2.(b)âTreatment by a duly accredited practitioner who 78 relies solely on spiritual means for healing in accordance with 79 the tenets and practices of a well-recognized church or 80 religious organization. 81 (b)âThere is evidence of acute or chronic use of a 82 controlled substance by a parent to the extent that the ongoing 83 threat of the parentâs future intoxication results in an 84 environment that causes the childâs physical, mental, or 85 emotional safety to be significantly impaired or to be in danger 86 of being significantly impaired. 87 88 Neglect of a child includes acts or omissions. 89 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 90 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 91 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 92 39.521, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 93 39.521âDisposition hearings; powers of disposition.â 94 (1)âA disposition hearing shall be conducted by the court, 95 if the court finds that the facts alleged in the petition for 96 dependency were proven in the adjudicatory hearing, or if the 97 parents or legal custodians have consented to the finding of 98 dependency or admitted the allegations in the petition, have 99 failed to appear for the arraignment hearing after proper 100 notice, or have not been located despite a diligent search 101 having been conducted. 102 (c)âWhen any child is adjudicated by a court to be 103 dependent, the court having jurisdiction of the child has the 104 power by order to: 105 1.âRequire the parent and, when appropriate, the legal 106 guardian or the child to participate in treatment and services 107 identified as necessary. The court may require the person who 108 has custody or who is requesting custody of the child to submit 109 to a mental health or substance abuse disorder assessment or 110 evaluation. The order may be made only upon good cause shown and 111 pursuant to notice and procedural requirements provided under 112 the Florida Rules of Juvenile Procedure. The mental health 113 assessment or evaluation must be administered by a qualified 114 professional as defined in s. 39.01, and the substance abuse 115 assessment or evaluation must be administered by a qualified 116 professional as defined in s. 397.311. The court may also 117 require such person to participate in and comply with treatment 118 and services identified as necessary, including, when 119 appropriate and available, participation in and compliance with 120 a mental health court program established under chapter 394 or a 121 treatment-based drug court program established under s. 397.334. 122 Adjudication of a child as dependent based upon evidence of harm 123 as defined in s. 39.01(37)(g) demonstrates good cause, and the 124 court shall require the parent whose actions caused the harm to 125 submit to a substance abuse disorder assessment or evaluation 126 and to participate and comply with treatment and services 127 identified in the assessment or evaluation as being necessary. 128 In addition to supervision by the department, the court, 129 including the mental health court program or the treatment-based 130 drug court program, may oversee the progress and compliance with 131 treatment by a person who has custody or is requesting custody 132 of the child. The court may impose appropriate available 133 sanctions for noncompliance upon a person who has custody or is 134 requesting custody of the child or make a finding of 135 noncompliance for consideration in determining whether an 136 alternative placement of the child is in the childâs best 137 interests. Any order entered under this subparagraph may be made 138 only upon good cause shown. This subparagraph does not authorize 139 placement of a child with a person seeking custody of the child, 140 other than the childâs parent or legal custodian, who requires 141 mental health or substance abuse disorder treatment. 142 2.âRequire, if the court deems necessary, the parties to 143 participate in dependency mediation. 144 3.âRequire placement of the child either under the 145 protective supervision of an authorized agent of the department 146 in the home of one or both of the childâs parents or in the home 147 of a relative of the child or another adult approved by the 148 court, or in the custody of the department. Protective 149 supervision continues until the court terminates it or until the 150 child reaches the age of 18, whichever date is first. Protective 151 supervision shall be terminated by the court whenever the court 152 determines that permanency has been achieved for the child, 153 whether with a parent, another relative, or a legal custodian, 154 and that protective supervision is no longer needed. The 155 termination of supervision may be with or without retaining 156 jurisdiction, at the courtâs discretion, and shall in either 157 case be considered a permanency option for the child. The order 158 terminating supervision by the department must set forth the 159 powers of the custodian of the child and include the powers 160 ordinarily granted to a guardian of the person of a minor unless 161 otherwise specified. Upon the courtâs termination of supervision 162 by the department, further judicial reviews are not required if 163 permanency has been established for the child. 164 4.âDetermine whether the child has a strong attachment to 165 the prospective permanent guardian and whether such guardian has 166 a strong commitment to permanently caring for the child. 167 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 168 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 169 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 170 39.6012, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 171 39.6012âCase plan tasks; services.â 172 (1)âThe services to be provided to the parent and the tasks 173 that must be completed are subject to the following: 174 (c)âIf there is evidence of harm as defined in s. 175 39.01(37)(g), the case plan must include as a required task for 176 the parent whose actions caused the harm that the parent submit 177 to a substance abuse disorder assessment or evaluation and 178 participate and comply with treatment and services identified in 179 the assessment or evaluation as being necessary. 180 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 181 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 182 reference thereto, paragraph (k) of subsection (1) of section 183 39.806, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 184 39.806âGrounds for termination of parental rights.â 185 (1)âGrounds for the termination of parental rights may be 186 established under any of the following circumstances: 187 (k)âA test administered at birth that indicated that the 188 childâs blood, urine, or meconium contained any amount of 189 alcohol or a controlled substance or metabolites of such 190 substances, the presence of which was not the result of medical 191 treatment administered to the mother or the newborn infant, and 192 the biological mother of the child is the biological mother of 193 at least one other child who was adjudicated dependent after a 194 finding of harm to the childâs health or welfare due to exposure 195 to a controlled substance or alcohol as defined in s. 39.01, 196 after which the biological mother had the opportunity to 197 participate in substance abuse treatment. 198 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 199 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 200 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 201 61.13, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 202 61.13âSupport of children; parenting and time-sharing; 203 powers of court.â 204 (2) 205 (c)âThe court shall determine all matters relating to 206 parenting and time-sharing of each minor child of the parties in 207 accordance with the best interests of the child and in 208 accordance with the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and 209 Enforcement Act, except that modification of a parenting plan 210 and time-sharing schedule requires a showing of a substantial 211 and material change of circumstances. 212 1.âIt is the public policy of this state that each minor 213 child has frequent and continuing contact with both parents 214 after the parents separate or the marriage of the parties is 215 dissolved and to encourage parents to share the rights and 216 responsibilities, and joys, of childrearing. Unless otherwise 217 provided in this section or agreed to by the parties, there is a 218 rebuttable presumption that equal time-sharing of a minor child 219 is in the best interests of the minor child. To rebut this 220 presumption, a party must prove by a preponderance of the 221 evidence that equal time-sharing is not in the best interests of 222 the minor child. Except when a time-sharing schedule is agreed 223 to by the parties and approved by the court, the court must 224 evaluate all of the factors set forth in subsection (3) and make 225 specific written findings of fact when creating or modifying a 226 time-sharing schedule. 227 2.âThe court shall order that the parental responsibility 228 for a minor child be shared by both parents unless the court 229 finds that shared parental responsibility would be detrimental 230 to the child. In determining detriment to the child, the court 231 shall consider: 232 a.âEvidence of domestic violence, as defined in s. 741.28; 233 b.âWhether either parent has or has had reasonable cause to 234 believe that he or she or his or her minor child or children are 235 or have been in imminent danger of becoming victims of an act of 236 domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28 or sexual violence as 237 defined in s. 784.046(1)(c) by the other parent against the 238 parent or against the child or children whom the parents share 239 in common regardless of whether a cause of action has been 240 brought or is currently pending in the court; 241 c.âWhether either parent has or has had reasonable cause to 242 believe that his or her minor child or children are or have been 243 in imminent danger of becoming victims of an act of abuse, 244 abandonment, or neglect, as those terms are defined in s. 39.01, 245 by the other parent against the child or children whom the 246 parents share in common regardless of whether a cause of action 247 has been brought or is currently pending in the court; and 248 d.âAny other relevant factors. 249 3.âThe following evidence creates a rebuttable presumption 250 that shared parental responsibility is detrimental to the child: 251 a.âA parent has been convicted of a misdemeanor of the 252 first degree or higher involving domestic violence, as defined 253 in s. 741.28 and chapter 775; 254 b.âA parent meets the criteria of s. 39.806(1)(d); or 255 c.âA parent has been convicted of or had adjudication 256 withheld for an offense enumerated in s. 943.0435(1)(h)1.a., and 257 at the time of the offense: 258 (I)âThe parent was 18 years of age or older. 259 (II)âThe victim was under 18 years of age or the parent 260 believed the victim to be under 18 years of age. 261 262 If the presumption is not rebutted after the convicted parent is 263 advised by the court that the presumption exists, shared 264 parental responsibility, including time-sharing with the child, 265 and decisions made regarding the child, may not be granted to 266 the convicted parent. However, the convicted parent is not 267 relieved of any obligation to provide financial support. If the 268 court determines that shared parental responsibility would be 269 detrimental to the child, it may order sole parental 270 responsibility and make such arrangements for time-sharing as 271 specified in the parenting plan as will best protect the child 272 or abused spouse from further harm. Whether or not there is a 273 conviction of any offense of domestic violence or child abuse or 274 the existence of an injunction for protection against domestic 275 violence, the court shall consider evidence of domestic violence 276 or child abuse as evidence of detriment to the child. 277 4.âIn ordering shared parental responsibility, the court 278 may consider the expressed desires of the parents and may grant 279 to one party the ultimate responsibility over specific aspects 280 of the childâs welfare or may divide those responsibilities 281 between the parties based on the best interests of the child. 282 Areas of responsibility may include education, health care, and 283 any other responsibilities that the court finds unique to a 284 particular family. 285 5.âThe court shall order sole parental responsibility for a 286 minor child to one parent, with or without time-sharing with the 287 other parent if it is in the best interests of the minor child. 288 6.âThere is a rebuttable presumption against granting time 289 sharing with a minor child if a parent has been convicted of or 290 had adjudication withheld for an offense enumerated in s. 291 943.0435(1)(h)1.a., and at the time of the offense: 292 a.âThe parent was 18 years of age or older. 293 b.âThe victim was under 18 years of age or the parent 294 believed the victim to be under 18 years of age. 295 296 A parent may rebut the presumption upon a specific finding in 297 writing by the court that the parent poses no significant risk 298 of harm to the child and that time-sharing is in the best 299 interests of the minor child. If the presumption is rebutted, 300 the court must consider all time-sharing factors in subsection 301 (3) when developing a time-sharing schedule. 302 7.âAccess to records and information pertaining to a minor 303 child, including, but not limited to, medical, dental, and 304 school records, may not be denied to either parent. Full rights 305 under this subparagraph apply to either parent unless a court 306 order specifically revokes these rights, including any 307 restrictions on these rights as provided in a domestic violence 308 injunction. A parent having rights under this subparagraph has 309 the same rights upon request as to form, substance, and manner 310 of access as are available to the other parent of a child, 311 including, without limitation, the right to in-person 312 communication with medical, dental, and education providers. 313 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 314 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 315 reference thereto, section 61.401, Florida Statutes, is 316 reenacted to read: 317 61.401âAppointment of guardian ad litem.âIn an action for 318 dissolution of marriage or for the creation, approval, or 319 modification of a parenting plan, if the court finds it is in 320 the best interest of the child, the court may appoint a guardian 321 ad litem to act as next friend of the child, investigator or 322 evaluator, not as attorney or advocate. The court in its 323 discretion may also appoint legal counsel for a child to act as 324 attorney or advocate; however, the guardian and the legal 325 counsel shall not be the same person. In such actions which 326 involve an allegation of child abuse, abandonment, or neglect as 327 defined in s. 39.01, which allegation is verified and determined 328 by the court to be well-founded, the court shall appoint a 329 guardian ad litem for the child. The guardian ad litem shall be 330 a party to any judicial proceeding from the date of the 331 appointment until the date of discharge. 332 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 333 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 334 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 61.402, Florida 335 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 336 61.402âQualifications of guardians ad litem.â 337 (3)âOnly a guardian ad litem who qualifies under paragraph 338 (1)(a) or paragraph (1)(c) may be appointed to a case in which 339 the court has determined that there are well-founded allegations 340 of child abuse, abandonment, or neglect as defined in s. 39.01. 341 Section 8.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 342 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 343 reference thereto, paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 344 390.01114, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 345 390.01114âParental Notice of and Consent for Abortion Act.â 346 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 347 (b)ââChild abuseâ means abandonment, abuse, harm, mental 348 injury, neglect, physical injury, or sexual abuse of a child as 349 those terms are defined in ss. 39.01, 827.04, and 984.03. 350 Section 9.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 351 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 352 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 744.309, Florida 353 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 354 744.309âWho may be appointed guardian of a resident ward.â 355 (3)âDISQUALIFIED PERSONS.âNo person who has been convicted 356 of a felony or who, from any incapacity or illness, is incapable 357 of discharging the duties of a guardian, or who is otherwise 358 unsuitable to perform the duties of a guardian, shall be 359 appointed to act as guardian. Further, no person who has been 360 judicially determined to have committed abuse, abandonment, or 361 neglect against a child as defined in s. 39.01 or s. 984.03(1), 362 (2), and (24), or who has been found guilty of, regardless of 363 adjudication, or entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty to, 364 any offense prohibited under s. 435.04 or similar statute of 365 another jurisdiction, shall be appointed to act as a guardian. 366 Except as provided in subsection (5) or subsection (6), a person 367 who provides substantial services to the proposed ward in a 368 professional or business capacity, or a creditor of the proposed 369 ward, may not be appointed guardian and retain that previous 370 professional or business relationship. A person may not be 371 appointed a guardian if he or she is in the employ of any 372 person, agency, government, or corporation that provides service 373 to the proposed ward in a professional or business capacity, 374 except that a person so employed may be appointed if he or she 375 is the spouse, adult child, parent, or sibling of the proposed 376 ward or the court determines that the potential conflict of 377 interest is insubstantial and that the appointment would clearly 378 be in the proposed wardâs best interest. The court may not 379 appoint a guardian in any other circumstance in which a conflict 380 of interest may occur. 381 Section 10.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 382 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 383 reference thereto, subsection (24) of section 984.03, Florida 384 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 385 984.03âDefinitions.âWhen used in this chapter, the term: 386 (24)ââNeglectâ has the same meaning as in s. 39.01(53). 387 Section 11.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 388 made by this act to section 39.01, Florida Statutes, in a 389 reference thereto, paragraph (c) of subsection (8) of section 390 1001.42, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 391 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 392 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 393 powers and perform all duties listed below: 394 (8)âSTUDENT WELFARE.â 395 (c)1.âIn accordance with the rights of parents enumerated 396 in ss. 1002.20 and 1014.04, adopt procedures for notifying a 397 studentâs parent if there is a change in the studentâs services 398 or monitoring related to the studentâs mental, emotional, or 399 physical health or well-being and the schoolâs ability to 400 provide a safe and supportive learning environment for the 401 student. The procedures must reinforce the fundamental right of 402 parents to make decisions regarding the upbringing and control 403 of their children by requiring school district personnel to 404 encourage a student to discuss issues relating to his or her 405 well-being with his or her parent or to facilitate discussion of 406 the issue with the parent. The procedures may not prohibit 407 parents from accessing any of their studentâs education and 408 health records created, maintained, or used by the school 409 district, as required by s. 1002.22(2). 410 2.âA school district may not adopt procedures or student 411 support forms that prohibit school district personnel from 412 notifying a parent about his or her studentâs mental, emotional, 413 or physical health or well-being, or a change in related 414 services or monitoring, or that encourage or have the effect of 415 encouraging a student to withhold from a parent such 416 information. School district personnel may not discourage or 417 prohibit parental notification of and involvement in critical 418 decisions affecting a studentâs mental, emotional, or physical 419 health or well-being. This subparagraph does not prohibit a 420 school district from adopting procedures that permit school 421 personnel to withhold such information from a parent if a 422 reasonably prudent person would believe that disclosure would 423 result in abuse, abandonment, or neglect, as those terms are 424 defined in s. 39.01. 425 3.âClassroom instruction by school personnel or third 426 parties on sexual orientation or gender identity may not occur 427 in prekindergarten through grade 8, except when required by ss. 428 1003.42(2)(o)3. and 1003.46. If such instruction is provided in 429 grades 9 through 12, the instruction must be age-appropriate or 430 developmentally appropriate for students in accordance with 431 state standards. This subparagraph applies to charter schools. 432 4.âStudent support services training developed or provided 433 by a school district to school district personnel must adhere to 434 student services guidelines, standards, and frameworks 435 established by the Department of Education. 436 5.âAt the beginning of the school year, each school 437 district shall notify parents of each health care service 438 offered at their studentâs school and the option to withhold 439 consent or decline any specific service in accordance with s. 440 1014.06. Parental consent to a health care service does not 441 waive the parentâs right to access his or her studentâs 442 educational or health records or to be notified about a change 443 in his or her studentâs services or monitoring as provided by 444 this paragraph. 445 6.âBefore administering a student well-being questionnaire 446 or health screening form to a student in kindergarten through 447 grade 3, the school district must provide the questionnaire or 448 health screening form to the parent and obtain the permission of 449 the parent. 450 7.âEach school district shall adopt procedures for a parent 451 to notify the principal, or his or her designee, regarding 452 concerns under this paragraph at his or her studentâs school and 453 the process for resolving those concerns within 7 calendar days 454 after notification by the parent. 455 a.âAt a minimum, the procedures must require that within 30 456 days after notification by the parent that the concern remains 457 unresolved, the school district must either resolve the concern 458 or provide a statement of the reasons for not resolving the 459 concern. 460 b.âIf a concern is not resolved by the school district, a 461 parent may: 462 (I)âRequest the Commissioner of Education to appoint a 463 special magistrate who is a member of The Florida Bar in good 464 standing and who has at least 5 yearsâ experience in 465 administrative law. The special magistrate shall determine facts 466 relating to the dispute over the school district procedure or 467 practice, consider information provided by the school district, 468 and render a recommended decision for resolution to the State 469 Board of Education within 30 days after receipt of the request 470 by the parent. The State Board of Education must approve or 471 reject the recommended decision at its next regularly scheduled 472 meeting that is more than 7 calendar days and no more than 30 473 days after the date the recommended decision is transmitted. The 474 costs of the special magistrate shall be borne by the school 475 district. The State Board of Education shall adopt rules, 476 including forms, necessary to implement this subparagraph. 477 (II)âBring an action against the school district to obtain 478 a declaratory judgment that the school district procedure or 479 practice violates this paragraph and seek injunctive relief. A 480 court may award damages and shall award reasonable attorney fees 481 and court costs to a parent who receives declaratory or 482 injunctive relief. 483 c.âEach school district shall adopt and post on its website 484 policies to notify parents of the procedures required under this 485 subparagraph. 486 d.âNothing contained in this subparagraph shall be 487 construed to abridge or alter rights of action or remedies in 488 equity already existing under the common law or general law. 489 Section 12.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.